Utah statutes.
57-2-11.   Witness must be known or identified.

No proof by a subscribing witness shall be taken unless such witness shall be personally known to the officer taking the proof to be the person whose name is subscribed to the conveyance as a witness thereto, or shall be proved to be such by the oath or affirmation of a credible witness personally known to such officer.

